Idaho statutes. Title 52 NUISANCES
Chapter 2
PUBLIC NUISANCES

Sec.

§ 52-201. Not legalized by prescription.

No lapse of time can legalize a public nuisance, amounting to an actual obstruction of public right.

§ 52-202. Remedies.

The remedies against a public nuisance are:

Indictment or information;

A civil action; or,

Abatement.

§ 52-203. Indictment or information.

The remedy by indictment or information is regulated by the Penal Code.

§ 52-204. Action by private person.

A private person may maintain an action:

For a moral nuisance, if he be a resident citizen of the county, whether the nuisance complained of is specially injurious to him or not.

For any other public nuisance, if it is specially injurious to himself.

§ 52-205. Abatement by public body or officer.

A public nuisance may be abated by any public body or officer authorized thereto by law.

§ 52-206. Abatement by private person.

Any person may abate a public nuisance which is specially injurious to him, by removing, or if necessary, destroying, the thing which constitutes the same, without committing a breach of the peace, or doing unnecessary injury.